New York, session 2025-2026, S5380.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The section heading of section 51 of the legislative law, 2 as added by chapter 985 of the laws of 1983, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 Fiscal impact notes on bills affecting political subdivisions; 5 introducer's memorandum. 6 § 2. Section 51 of the legislative law is amended by adding a new 7 subdivision 5 to read as follows: 8 5. Every introducer's memorandum appended to a bill shall include a 9 statement of fiscal impact affecting political subdivisions. Such 10 statement of fiscal impact affecting political subdivisions shall set 11 forth the fiscal impact of the bill on a political subdivision or subdi- 12 visions. 13 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10087-01-5